Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB827.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Cross-Age Tutoring Program.--(a) The Department of Education shall establish and publish on the Department of Education's publicly accessible Internet website evidence-based guidelines for the Cross-age Tutoring Program in which public school students in grades eleven and twelve, under the supervision of a certified teacher or paraprofessional, may volunteer as a tutor to assist another student with their studies. The guidelines shall, at a minimum, provide for the 12345678910111213141516171819 following:(1) The qualifications of students eligible to serve as tutors.(2) The qualifications of students eligible for tutoring. (3) That participating tutors receive academic credits for serving as tutors.(4) Ways to encourage students in grades eleven and twelve who are not meeting their academic benchmarks to volunteer for the program as tutors , if it is determined that serving as tutors could improve their own academic performance.(5) Training for students serving as tutors.(6) Coordination with the certified teacher or paraprofessional.(7) Structure of tutoring sessions for both content and instruction delivery.(8) Frequency of tutoring sessions for both content and instruction delivery.(b) The program shall be available to all public school entities in this Commonwealth. (c) Tutoring services provided as part of the program may not replace or diminish services provided by an employe of a public school entity, but shall serve as a supplement to instructional and educational services to aid in enhancing the academic performance of the student to be tutored.(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Limit a public school entity's authority or ability to develop and implement alternative cross-age tutoring programs.(2) Supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and procedures afforded to school employes or labor organizations under Federal or State law, including the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, 20250HB0827PN0854 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act," or any provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between a school employer and an exclusive representative of the employes in accordance with the "Public Employe Relations Act."(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cross-age tutoring." Tutoring that a student in an upper grade level provides to a student in a lower grade level. The term does not include tutoring that a student provides to a peer in the same grade or in a higher grade."Paraprofessional." An individual who provides services to students to supplement an appropriately certified teacher in the performance of the teacher's instructional duties."Program." The Cross-age Tutoring Program established under this section."Public school entity." A school district, area career and technical school, intermediate unit, charter school, regional charter school and cyber charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0827PN0854 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920